Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202580-316
Veterans homes; purpose; admission; requirements.

(1) The department shall provide long-term care to:

(a) All persons who either served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, other than active duty for training, or served on active duty in the Nebraska National Guard, including active duty for training, and who were discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions) if, at the time of making an application for admission to one of the Nebraska veterans homes:

(i) The applicant has been a bona fide resident of the State of Nebraska for at least two years; and

(ii) The applicant is in need of long-term care available at one of the Nebraska veterans homes;

(b) The spouse of any such person admitted to one of the homes who has been married to such member for at least two years before his or her entrance into the home;

(c) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the surviving spouses and parents of eligible servicemen and servicewomen as defined in subdivision (a) of this subsection who died while in the service of the United States or who have since died of a service-connected disability as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; and

(d) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the surviving spouses of eligible servicemen or servicewomen as defined in subdivision (a) of this subsection who have since died.

(2) The surviving spouses and parents referred to in subdivision (1)(c) or (d) of this section shall be eligible for such care if, at the time of applying, they:

(a) Have been bona fide residents of the State of Nebraska for at least two years; and

(b) Are unable to earn a livelihood.

(3) No one admitted to one of the Nebraska veterans homes under conditions enumerated in this section shall have a vested right to continued residence in such home if such person ceases to meet any of the eligibility requirements of this section, except that no person who has been regularly admitted shall be denied continued residence solely because of his or her marriage to a member of one of the homes.

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 5;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 26;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 719;

Laws 2009, LB488, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB340, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 47;

Laws 2025, LB419, § 1.